Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.360

Full reassessment of resident.

(1) The assisted living facility licensee shall within fourteen days of the resident's date of move-in, unless extended by the department for good cause, and thereafter at least annually, complete a full reassessment addressing the following:

(a) The individual's recent medical history, including, but not limited to: A health professional's diagnosis, unless the resident objects for religious reasons; chronic, current, and potential skin conditions; known allergies to foods or medications; or other considerations for providing care or services;

(b) Current necessary and contraindicated medications and treatments for the individual, including:

(i) Any prescribed medications and over-the-counter medications that are commonly taken by the individual, and that the individual is able to independently self-administer or safely and accurately direct others to administer to him or her;

(ii) Any prescribed medications and over-the-counter medications that are commonly taken by the individual and that the individual is able to self-administer when he or she has the assistance of a resident-care staff person; and

(iii) Any prescribed medications and over-the-counter medications that are commonly taken by the individual and that the individual is not able to self-administer;

(c) The individual's nursing needs when the individual requires the services of a nurse on the assisted living facility premises;

(d) The individual's sensory abilities, including vision and hearing;

(e) The individual's communication abilities, including modes of expression, ability to make himself or herself understood, and ability to understand others;

(f) Significant known behaviors or symptoms of the individual causing concern or requiring special care, including: History of substance abuse; history of harming self, others, or property, or other conditions that may require behavioral intervention strategies; the individual's ability to leave the assisted living facility unsupervised; and other safety considerations that may pose a danger to the individual or others, such as use of medical devices or the individual's ability to smoke unsupervised, if smoking is permitted in the assisted living facility;

(g) The individual's special needs, by evaluating available information, or selecting and using an appropriate tool to determine the presence of symptoms consistent with, and implications for care and services of: Mental illness, or needs for psychological or mental health services, except where protected by confidentiality laws; developmental disability; dementia; or other conditions affecting cognition, such as traumatic brain injury;

(h) The individual's level of personal care needs, including: Ability to perform activities of daily living; medication management ability, including the individual's ability to obtain and appropriately use over-the-counter medications; and how the individual will obtain prescribed medications for use in the assisted living facility;

(i) The individual's activities, typical daily routines, habits, and service preferences;

(j) The individual's personal identity and lifestyle, to the extent the individual is willing to share the information, and the manner in which they are expressed, including preferences regarding food, community contacts, hobbies, spiritual preferences, or other sources of pleasure and comfort; and

(k) Who has decision-making authority for the individual, including: The presence of any advance directive, or other legal document that will establish a substitute decision maker in the future; the presence of any legal document that establishes a current substitute decision maker; and the scope of decision-making authority of any substitute decision maker.

(2) The assisted living facility shall complete a limited assessment of a resident's change of condition when the resident's negotiated service agreement no longer addresses the resident's current needs.

[ 2012 c 10 s 25; 2004 c 142 s 8.]

NOTES:

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.

Effective dates—2004 c 142: See note following RCW 18.20.020.